Utah statutes.
13-1a-3.   Employment and compensation of personnel -- Compensation of director.

The director, with the approval of the executive director, may employ personnel necessary to carry out the duties and responsibilities of the division at salaries established by the executive director according to standards established by the Department of Human Resource Management.  The executive director shall establish the salary of the director according to standards established by the Department of Human Resource Management.



Amended by Chapter 139, 2006 General Session

